el: Τύπος εργαλείου κατασκευής κεριών: Κηροσβέστης; Μπεν μαρί / ένθετο σκεύος τήξης; Πιστόλι θερμού αέρα; Γάντια ανθεκτικά στη θερμότητα; Δοσομετρητής; Εργαλείο αποκόλλησης καλουπιού; Κανάτα / δοχείο (beaker); Χωνί έκχυσης; Δοχείο έκχυσης (με στόμιο); Ζυγαριά; Καλαμάκι / εργαλείο τρυπήματος; Κουτάλα ανάδευσης / σπάτουλα; Θερμόμετρο; Δοχείο τήξης κεριού / κανάτα; Εργαλείο κεντραρίσματος φυτιλιού; Βυθιστής φυτιλιού; Στήριγμα φυτιλιού; Ψαλίδι φυτιλιού; Άλλο
pl: Typ narzędzia do wytwarzania świec: Gaszak do świec; Naczynie do kąpieli wodnej / wkład do topienia; Opalarka; Rękawice żaroodporne; Miarka; Narzędzie do wyjmowania z formy; Dzbanek / zlewka; Lejek do nalewania; Naczynie z dzióbkiem; Waga; Szpikulec; Łyżka do mieszania / szpatułka; Termometr; Naczynie / dzbanek do topienia wosku; Narzędzie do centrowania knota; Haczyk do gaszenia świec; Uchwyt do knota / blaszka do knota; Nożyce do knota; Inne
de: Art des Kerzenherstellungswerkzeugs: Kerzenlöscher; Wasserbad / Schmelzeinsatz; Heißluftpistole; Hitzebeständige Handschuhe; Messbecher; Entformwerkzeug; Krug / Becher; Einfülltrichter; Gießtopf (mit Ausguss); Waage; Spieß / Stechwerkzeug; Rührlöffel / Spatel; Thermometer; Wachsschmelztopf / Krug; Dochtzentrierer; Docht-Dipper; Dochthalter / Dochtschiene; Dochtschere; Sonstige
ja: キャンドル作りの道具タイプ: キャンドルスナッファー; 湯煎鍋/溶解用インサート; ヒートガン; 耐熱グローブ; 計量カップ; 型抜きツール; ピッチャー/ビーカー; 注入ろうと; 注ぎポット (注ぎ口あり); はかり; 串/ポークツール; かき混ぜスプーン/スパチュラ; 温度計; ワックス溶解ポット/ピッチャー; 芯固定ツール; ウィックディッパー; ウィックホルダー/ウィックバー; ウィックトリマー; その他
sv: Typ av verktyg för ljustillverkning: Ljusläckare; Vattenbad/smältinsats; Värmepistol; Värmetåliga handskar; Måttbägare; Verktyg för lossning från form; Kanna/bägare; Påfyllningstratt; Smältkanna (med hällpip); Våg; Stick-/hålverktyg; Omrörningssked/spatel; Termometer; Vaxsmältare/kanna; Vekcentrerare; Vekdoppare; Vekhållare/vekpinne; Vektrimmer; Övrigt
fi: Kynttilänvalmistustyökalun tyyppi: Kynttilänsammutin; Vesihaudekattila / sulatusastia; Kuumailmapuhallin; Lämmönkestävät käsineet; Mittalasi; Muotinirrotustyökalu; Kaadin / dekantterilasi; Kaatosuppilo; Kaatokattila (nokallinen); Vaaka; Varras / pistotyökalu; Sekoituslusikka / spaatteli; Lämpömittari; Vahansulatuskattila / kaadin; Sydänlangan keskitystyökalu; Sydänlangan upotin; Sydänlangan pidike; Sydänlangan leikkuri; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de ferramenta para fabricação de velas: Apagador de vela; Panela de banho-maria / inserto para derretimento; Pistola de ar quente; Luvas resistentes ao calor; Copo medidor; Ferramenta de desmoldagem; Jarro / béquer; Funil de despejo; Pote de despejo (com bico); Balança; Espeto / ferramenta para perfurar; Colher / espátula de mistura; Termômetro; Pote / jarro de derretimento de cera; Ferramenta de centralização do pavio; Mergilhador de pavio; Suporte de pavio / barra de pavio; Aparador de pavio; Outro
sk-SK: Typ nástroja na výrobu sviečok: Zhášadlo na sviečky; Nádoba na vodný kúpeľ/vložka na tavenie; Teplovzdušná pištoľ; Teplovzdorné rukavice; Odmerka; Nástroj na vyklápanie z formy; Džbán/kadička; Lievik na vylievanie; Nádoba na vylievanie (s výlevkou); Váha; Ihla/nástroj na prepichovanie; Lyžica/špachtľa na miešanie; Teplomer; Taviaca nádoba/džbán na vosk; Držiak na vycentrovanie knôtu; Zhášací háčik na knôt; Držiak knôtu/lišta na knôt; Zastrihávač knôtu; Iné
it: tipo di strumento per la fabbricazione di candele: Spegnicandela; Bagnomaria / inserto per fondere; Pistola termica; Guanti resistenti al calore; Misurino; Strumento per estrarre dallo stampo; Caraffa / becher; Imbuto per colare; Bricco per versare (con beccuccio); Bilancia; Spiedo / strumento per forare; Cucchiaio per mescolare / spatola; Termometro; Pentola per fondere cera / caraffa; Strumento per centrare lo stoppino; Spegnistoppino; Supporto / barra per stoppino; Forbici per stoppino; Altro
es: Tipo de herramienta para hacer velas: Apagavelas; Baño María/inserto para derretir; Pistola de calor; Guantes resistentes al calor; Taza medidora; Herramienta de desmoldeo; Jarra/vaso de precipitados; Embudo de vertido; Jarra de vertido (con boquilla); Báscula; Brocheta/herramienta para perforar; Cuchara para revolver/espátula; Termómetro; Olla/jarra para derretir cera; Herramienta para centrar la mecha; Hundidor de mecha; Soporte para mecha/barra para mecha; Cortamechas; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de ferramenta para fabrico de velas: Abafador de velas; Banho-maria/inserto de derretimento; Pistola de calor; Luvas resistentes ao calor; Copo medidor; Ferramenta de desmoldagem; Jarro/proveta; Funil de vazamento; Recipiente de vazamento (com bico); Balança; Espeto/furador; Colher de mexer/espátula; Termómetro; Panela/jarro de derreter cera; Centrador de pavio; Mergulhador de pavio; Suporte/barra de pavio; Aparador de pavio; Outro
nl: Kaars maken hulpmiddel type: Kaarsendover; Au-bain-mariepan / smelt-inzetstuk; Heteluchtpistool; Hittebestendige handschoenen; Maatbeker; Ontkistingsgereedschap; Schenkkan / beker; Schenktrechter; Schenkkan (met tuit); Weegschaal; Spies / prikker; Roerlepel / spatel; Thermometer; Wassmeltkroes / -kan; Lontcentreergereedschap; Lontdompelaar; Lonthouder / lontstaafje; Lontknipper; Overig
ro-RO: Tip de instrument pentru fabricarea lumânărilor: Stingător de lumânări; Vas pentru bain-marie / vas de topire; Pistol cu aer cald; Mănuși termorezistente; Cană gradată; Instrument de eliberare din matriță; Carafă / pahar Berzelius; Pâlnie de turnare; Vas de turnare (cu cioc); Cântar; Frigăruie / instrument de perforat; Lingură de amestecat / spatulă; Termometru; Vas de topire a cerii / carafă; Instrument de centrare a fitilului; Scufundător de fitil; Suport de fitil / bară pentru fitil; Foarfecă pentru fitil; Altele
fr: Type d’outil de fabrication de bougies: Éteignoir à bougie; Bain-marie/récipient de fonte; Pistolet thermique; Gants thermorésistants; Gobelet doseur; Outil de démoulage; Pichet/bécher; Entonnoir de versement; Pot verseur (à bec); Balance; Brochette/outil de perçage; Cuillère à mélanger/spatule; Thermomètre; Pot/pichet de fonte de cire; Outil de centrage de mèche; Trempe-mèche; Support de mèche/barre de mèche; Coupe-mèche; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta orodja za izdelavo sveč: Dušilec plamena; Vodna kopel / vstavek za topljenje; Toplotna pištola; Rokavice, odporne na vročino; Merilna posoda; Orodje za sprostitev kalupa; Vrč / čaša; Lijak za vlivanje; Posoda za vlivanje (z dulcem); Tehtnica; Nabodalo / orodje za prebadanje; Žlica za mešanje / lopatica; Termometer; Posoda / vrč za topljenje voska; Orodje za centriranje stenja; Pripomoček za potopitev stenja; Držalo za stenj / palica za stenj; Škarje za stenj; Drugo
nb: Type verktøy for å lage lys: Lyseslukker; Vannbad / smelteinnsats; Varmepistol; Varmebestandige hansker; Målebeger; Verktøy for å løsne former; Mugge / beger; Helletrakt; Hellekanne (med tut); Vekt; Spyd / stikkeverktøy; Røreskje / slikkepott; Termometer; Vokssmelter / mugge; Veke-sentreringsverktøy; Vekedypper; Vekeholder / vekestang; Veketrimmer; Annet
hu: Gyertyakészítő eszköz típusa: Gyertyaoltó; Vízfürdős olvasztóedény / olvasztóbetét; Hőlégfúvó; Hőálló kesztyű; Mérőpohár; Formaelválasztó eszköz; Kancsó / főzőpohár; Tölcsér; Kiöntőedény (csőrös); Mérleg; Nyárs / szurkáló eszköz; Keverőkanál / spatula; Hőmérő; Viaszolvasztó edény / kancsó; Kanócközpontosító; Kanócmerítő; Kanóctartó; Kanócvágó; Egyéb
vi: Loại dụng cụ làm nến: Dụng cụ dập lửa nến; Nồi đun cách thủy / Khay đun; Súng thổi hơi nóng; Găng tay chịu nhiệt; Cốc đong; Dụng cụ tháo khuôn; Bình rót / Cốc mỏ; Phễu rót; Nồi rót (có vòi); Cân; Que xiên / Dụng cụ chọc; Thìa / Phới khuấy; Nhiệt kế; Nồi / Bình nấu sáp; Dụng cụ cố định tâm bấc; Dụng cụ dìm bấc; Giá đỡ bấc / Thanh kẹp bấc; Kéo cắt bấc; Khác
ko: 양초 제작 도구 유형: 캔들 스너퍼; 이중 냄비/용해 인서트; 히트 건; 내열 장갑; 계량 컵; 탈형 도구; 피처/비커; 푸어링 깔때기; 푸어링 포트(스파우트); 저울; 꼬치/찌르기 도구; 젓는 숟가락/스패출러; 온도계; 왁스 용해 포트/피처; 심지 고정 도구; 윅 디퍼; 심지 홀더/윅 바; 윅 트리머; 기타
bg-BG: Тип инструмент за изработка на свещи: Угасител за свещи; Съд за водна баня / вложка за топене; Пистолет за горещ въздух; Термоустойчиви ръкавици; Мерителна чаша; Инструмент за освобождаване от формата; Кана / бехерова чаша; Фуния за наливане; Съд за наливане (с чучур); Везна; Шишче / инструмент за пробиване; Лъжица за разбъркване / шпатула; Термометър; Съд / кана за топене на восък; Инструмент за центриране на фитила; Кука за фитил (dipper); Държач за фитил / летвичка за фитил; Ножица за фитил; Други
cs: Typ nástroje na výrobu svíček: Zhášedlo na svíčky; Vodní lázeň / tavná vložka; Horkovzdušná pistole; Tepelně odolné rukavice; Odměrka; Nástroj na uvolnění formy; Džbánek/kádinka; Nalévací trychtýř; Nádoba na nalévání (s výlevkou); Váha; Špejle/nástroj na propichování; Míchací lžíce / špachtle; Teploměr; Tavná nádoba / džbánek na vosk; Nástroj na vycentrování knotu; Zhášedlo na knoty; Držák na knot / fixační lišta; Nůžky na knoty; Jiné
zh-TW: 蠟燭製作工具類型: 滅燭罩; 隔水加熱鍋 / 融蠟內鍋; 熱風槍; 防熱手套; 量杯; 脫模工具; 壺 / 燒杯; 倒料漏斗; 倒料壺 (帶尖嘴); 秤; 串籤 / 戳孔工具; 攪拌匙 / 刮刀; 溫度計; 融蠟鍋 / 壺; 燭芯固定器; 滅燭鉤; 燭芯夾 / 燭芯固定架; 剪燭剪; 其他
en: Candle making tool type: Candle snuffer; Double boiler / melting insert; Heat gun; Heat-resistant gloves; Measuring cup; Mold release tool; Pitcher / beaker; Pouring funnel; Pouring pot (spouted); Scale; Skewer / poke tool; Stirring spoon / spatula; Thermometer; Wax melting pot / pitcher; Wick centering tool; Wick dipper; Wick holder / wick bar; Wick trimmer; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta alata za izradu svijeća: Zvono za gašenje svijeća; Posuda za kuhanje na pari / umetak za topljenje; Toplinski pištolj; Rukavice otporne na toplinu; Mjerna posuda; Alat za vađenje iz kalupa; Vrč / laboratorijska čaša; Lijevak za ulijevanje; Lončić za izlijevanje (s lijevkom); Vaga; Štapić / alat za bušenje; Žlica za miješanje / lopatica; Termometar; Lončić / vrč za topljenje voska; Alat za centriranje fitilja; Kuka za fitilj; Držač fitilja / polugica za fitilj; Škare za fitilj; Ostalo
lt-LT: Žvakių gamybos įrankio tipas: Žvakių gesiklis; Dvigubas katilas / lydymo indas; Karšto oro pistoletas; Karščiui atsparios pirštinės; Matavimo indas; Formos nuėmimo įrankis; Ąsotis / menzūra; Pylimo piltuvėlis; Pylimo indas (su snapeliu); Svarstyklės; Iešmelis / dūrimo įrankis; Maišymo šaukštas / mentelė; Termometras; Vaško lydymo indas / ąsotis; Dagties centravimo įrankis; Dagties panardinimo įrankis; Dagties laikiklis; Dagties žirklės; Kita
zh-CN: 蜡烛制作工具类型: 灭烛罩; 隔水炖锅/熔化内胆; 热风枪; 耐热手套; 量杯; 脱模工具; 量水罐/烧杯; 倒料漏斗; 倒料锅（带尖嘴）; 秤; 签子/戳刺工具; 搅拌匙/刮刀; 温度计; 熔蜡锅/量水罐; 烛芯居中工具; 灭烛钩; 烛芯固定夹/烛芯定型杆; 灭烛剪; 其他
tr: Mum yapım aracı tipi: Mum söndürücü; Benmari/eritme kabı; Isı tabancası; Isıya dayanıklı eldivenler; Ölçü kabı; Kalıp ayırma aleti; Sürahi/beher; Dökme hunisi; Dökme kabı (ağızlı); Tartı; Şiş/delme aleti; Karıştırma kaşığı/spatula; Termometre; Balmumu eritme kabı/sürahisi; Fitil ortalama aleti; Fitil daldırıcı; Fitil tutucu/fitil çubuğu; Fitil makası; Diğer
da: Type af værktøj til fremstilling af stearinlys: Lyseslukker; Vandbad / smelteindsats; Varmepistol; Varmebestandige handsker; Målebæger; Værktøj til frigørelse fra form; Kande / bæger; Hældetragt; Hældekande (med tud); Vægt; Træspyd / prikkeværktøj; Røreske / spatel; Termometer; Vokssmeltegryde / kande; Vægecentreringsværktøj; Vægekrog (dipper); Vægeholder; Vægesaks; Andet
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์ทำเทียน: ที่ดับเทียน; หม้อตุ๋น / หม้อต้มสองชั้น; ปืนเป่าลมร้อน; ถุงมือกันความร้อน; ถ้วยตวง; เครื่องมือแกะแม่พิมพ์; เหยือก / บีกเกอร์; กรวยริน; หม้อเท (มีพวยกา); เครื่องชั่ง; ไม้เสียบ / เครื่องมือเจาะ; ช้อนคน / ไม้พาย; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; หม้อต้มขี้ผึ้ง / เหยือก; เครื่องมือจัดกึ่งกลางไส้เทียน; ที่กดไส้เทียน; ที่ยึดไส้เทียน / แกนยึดไส้เทียน; กรรไกรตัดไส้เทียน; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип инструмента для изготовления свечей: Пламегаситель для свечей; Водяная баня / вставка для плавления; Термофен; Термостойкие перчатки; Мерный стакан; Инструмент для извлечения из формы; Кувшин / мензурка; Воронка для заливки; Емкость для заливки (с носиком); Весы; Шпажка / инструмент для прокола; Ложка для перемешивания / лопатка; Термометр; Плавильня для воска / кувшин; Центрователь для фитиля; Крючок для фитиля; Держатель для фитиля; Ножницы для фитиля; Другое